Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4271.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [168.0133] ELECTRONIC SIGNATURES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Electronic" means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities. new text end new text begin (c) "Electronic signature" means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with a document, form, physical odometer document, or other record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign, agree to, or otherwise acknowledge the information and facts contained within the document, form, physical odometer document, or other record are accurate. new text end new text begin (d) "Physical odometer document" means a document containing an odometer disclosure statement printed on paper by a secure printing process or other secure process by any jurisdiction in compliance with Code of Federal Regulations, title 49, part 580. Physical odometer document includes certificates of title, secure powers of attorney, and reassignment documents. Physical odometer document does not include any other form or document, even if the document contains a space for an odometer reading. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Acceptance of electronic signatures. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must accept electronic signatures on any document, form, physical odometer document, or record necessary or required under this chapter. new text end new text begin (b) A physical odometer document that is made electronic by imaging, scanning, or other similar process: (1) is not an electronic power of attorney or electronic title, as defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 49, section 580.3; and (2) must be accepted if subsequently executed with an electronic signature. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must accept any document, form, physical odometer document, or record with an electronic signature by: new text end new text begin (1) electronic means if the commissioner has a process or system available to accept documents, forms, physical odometer documents, or records by electronic means; or new text end new text begin (2) physical means, such that the document, form, physical odometer document, or record is printed on paper. new text end new text begin (d) A physical odometer document that: new text end new text begin (1) is a certificate of title, secure power of attorney, or dealer reassignment; new text end new text begin (2) contains data or information completed by handwriting or printing; new text end new text begin (3) is subsequently made electronic by imaging, scanning, or other similar process; new text end new text begin (4) is signed electronically; and new text end new text begin (5) requires submission to the commissioner by physical means new text end new text begin must include with the submission the physical odometer document in its original format prior to its execution by electronic signature. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Requirements and limitations. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner: new text end new text begin (1) may require a document containing an electronic signature to include an indication that the signature is electronic; new text end new text begin (2) must not require an electronic signature process or an electronic signature vendor be certified by the commissioner before accepting a document that is executed with an electronic signature; new text end new text begin (3) must not require a document that has been executed with an electronic signature to be converted to physical format by printing for any purpose, except when submission by physical means is required; new text end new text begin (4) must not impose any additional requirement upon an electronic signature except as authorized by this section; and new text end new text begin (5) may require a certification of authenticity, audit trail, or similar statement or proof of assurance. new text end new text begin (b) The system or person granting access to the system used to capture an electronic signature must verify the identity of the user accessing the system. The system must: new text end new text begin (1) be securely maintained; new text end new text begin (2) capture and retain the user's information, including the Internet Protocol address of the user and a date and time stamp of system access or electronic signature capture; and new text end new text begin (3) retain all information provided to the system for a period of five years, which must be made available upon request to the commissioner, other regulatory agencies, or law enforcement. new text end new text begin (c) This section must not be construed to require, limit, prohibit, or otherwise hinder the commissioner's ability to provide electronic services, systems, or alternative methods to receiving and transmitting electronic data, documents, or records, including electronic signature capturing or identity verification. new text end new text begin (d) This section must not be construed to require, limit, prohibit, or otherwise hinder the commissioner from providing or issuing an electronic power of attorney or electronic title, as defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 49, part 580.3, or providing an electronic signature process, system, platform, or service. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Use of electronic signatures. new text end new text begin Electronic signatures may not be used for any purpose other than the purpose indicated by the signer on the document and must be linked to the signer's respective electronic records to ensure that the signature cannot be excised, copied, or otherwise transferred unless expressly authorized by the signer. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Conflict. new text end new text begin This section prevails in any conflict arising with any other provision in this chapter. The Uniform Electronic Transactions Act under chapter 325L prevails in any conflict with this section and governs any area not expressly addressed in this section. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.33, subdivision 8a, is amended to read: Subd. 8a. Electronic transmission. (a) deleted text begin Ifdeleted text end The commissioner deleted text begin acceptsdeleted text end new text begin must acceptnew text end electronic transmission of a motor vehicle transfer and registration by a new or used motor vehicle dealerdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin and other users, as authorized by the commissioner.new text end A deputy registrar who is equipped with electronic transmission technology and trained in its use must receive the filing fee provided for in subdivision 7 and review the transfer of each new or used motor vehicle to determine its genuineness and regularity before issuance of a certificate of title, and must receive and retain the filing fee under subdivision 7, paragraph (a), clause (2). (b) The commissioner must establish reasonable performance, security, technical, and financial standards to approve companies that provide computer software and services to motor vehicle dealers to electronically transmit vehicle title transfer and registration informationnew text begin and other documentsnew text end . An approved company must be offered access to department facilities, staff, and technology on a fair and reasonable basis. An approved company must not have an ownership interest with a deputy registrar or a driver's license agent. An approved company is not eligible to be appointed by the commissioner as a deputy registrar or a driver's license agent. new text begin (c) Physical documents transmitted in electronic form, such as by imaging, scanning, or other similar means, must be retained by the person or entity submitting the documents, as determined by the commissioner. Documents and information that are not produced in physical form are not required to be converted to physical form for retention purposes but must be retained electronically for a period of time as determined by the commissioner. A person or entity that submits documents under this subdivision is not required to provide physical documents to the commissioner or a deputy registrar as a routine course of business. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [168A.045] ELECTRONIC SIGNATURES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Electronic" means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities. new text end new text begin (c) "Electronic signature" means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with a document, form, physical odometer document, or other record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign, agree to, or otherwise acknowledge the information and facts contained within the document, form, physical odometer document, or other record are accurate. new text end new text begin (d) "Physical odometer document" means a document containing an odometer disclosure statement printed on paper by a secure printing process or other secure process by any jurisdiction in compliance with Code of Federal Regulations, title 49, part 580. Physical odometer document includes certificates of title, secure powers of attorney, and reassignment documents. Physical odometer document does not include any other form or document, even if the document contains a space for an odometer reading. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Acceptance of electronic signatures. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must accept electronic signatures on any document, form, physical odometer document, or record necessary or required under this chapter. new text end new text begin (b) A physical odometer document that is made electronic by imaging, scanning, or other similar process: (1) is not an electronic power of attorney or electronic title, as defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 49, section 580.3; and (2) must be accepted if subsequently executed with an electronic signature. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must accept any document, form, physical odometer document, or record with an electronic signature by: new text end new text begin (1) electronic means if the commissioner has a process or system available to accept documents, forms, physical odometer documents, or records by electronic means; or new text end new text begin (2) physical means, such that the document, form, physical odometer document, or record is printed on paper. new text end new text begin (d) A physical odometer document that: new text end new text begin (1) is a certificate of title, secure power of attorney, or dealer reassignment; new text end new text begin (2) contains data or information completed by handwriting or printing; new text end new text begin (3) is subsequently made electronic by imaging, scanning, or other similar process; new text end new text begin (4) is signed electronically; and new text end new text begin (5) requires submission to the commissioner by physical means new text end new text begin must include with the submission the physical odometer document in its original format prior to its execution by electronic signature. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Requirements and limitations. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner: new text end new text begin (1) may require a document containing an electronic signature to include an indication that the signature is electronic; new text end new text begin (2) must not require an electronic signature process or an electronic signature vendor be certified by the commissioner before accepting a document that is executed with an electronic signature; new text end new text begin (3) must not require a document that has been executed with an electronic signature to be converted to physical format by printing for any purpose, except when submission by physical means is required; new text end new text begin (4) must not impose any additional requirement upon an electronic signature except as authorized by this section; and new text end new text begin (5) may require a certification of authenticity, audit trail, or similar statement or proof of assurance. new text end new text begin (b) The system or person granting access to the system used to capture an electronic signature must verify the identity of the user accessing the system. The system must: new text end new text begin (1) be securely maintained; new text end new text begin (2) capture and retain the user's information, including the Internet Protocol address of the user and a date and time stamp of system access or electronic signature capture; and new text end new text begin (3) retain all information provided to the system for a period of five years, which must be made available upon request to the commissioner, other regulatory agencies, or law enforcement. new text end new text begin (c) This section must not be construed to require, limit, prohibit, or otherwise hinder the commissioner's ability to provide electronic services, systems, or alternative methods to receiving and transmitting electronic data, documents, or records, including electronic signature capturing or identity verification. new text end new text begin (d) This section must not be construed to require, limit, prohibit, or otherwise hinder the commissioner from providing or issuing an electronic power of attorney or electronic title, as defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 49, part 580.3, or providing an electronic signature process, system, platform, or service. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Use of electronic signatures. new text end new text begin Electronic signatures may not be used for any purpose other than the purpose indicated by the signer on the document and must be linked to the signer's respective electronic records to ensure that the signature cannot be excised, copied, or otherwise transferred unless expressly authorized by the signer. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Conflict. new text end new text begin This section prevails in any conflict arising with any other provision in this chapter. The Uniform Electronic Transactions Act under chapter 325L prevails in any conflict with this section and governs any area not expressly addressed in this section. new text end